prince/dictionaries/he-IL.aff
PFX V   0 כב" .
PFX V   0 כבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 ככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 ככ וו
PFX V   0 ככ" .
PFX V   0 ככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כל [^ו]
PFX V   0 כל וו
PFX V   0 כל" .
PFX V   0 כלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כמ וו
PFX V   0 כמ" .
PFX V   0 כמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כש [^ו]
PFX V   0 כש וו
PFX V   0 כש" .
PFX V   0 כשו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשב [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשב וו
PFX V   0 כשב" .
PFX V   0 כשבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשבכ וו
PFX V   0 כשבכ" .
PFX V   0 כשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכ וו
PFX V   0 כשכ" .
PFX V   0 כשכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכב וו
PFX V   0 כשכב" .
PFX V   0 כשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשככ וו
PFX V   0 כשככ" .
PFX V   0 כשככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכל וו
PFX V   0 כשכל" .
PFX V   0 כשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשכמ וו
PFX V   0 כשכמ" .
PFX V   0 כשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשל [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשל וו
PFX V   0 כשל" .
PFX V   0 כשלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשלכ וו
PFX V   0 כשלכ" .
PFX V   0 כשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשמ וו
PFX V   0 כשמ" .
PFX V   0 כשמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 כשמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 כשמכ וו
PFX V   0 כשמכ" .
PFX V   0 כשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 ל [^ו]
PFX V   0 ל וו
PFX V   0 ל" .
PFX V   0 לו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכ וו
PFX V   0 לכ" .
PFX V   0 לכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכש [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכש וו
PFX V   0 לכש" .
PFX V   0 לכשו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשב [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשב וו
PFX V   0 לכשב" .
PFX V   0 לכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשבכ וו
PFX V   0 לכשבכ" .
PFX V   0 לכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכ וו
PFX V   0 לכשכ" .
PFX V   0 לכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכב וו
PFX V   0 לכשכב" .
PFX V   0 לכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשככ וו
PFX V   0 לכשככ" .
PFX V   0 לכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכל וו
PFX V   0 לכשכל" .
PFX V   0 לכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשכמ וו
PFX V   0 לכשכמ" .
PFX V   0 לכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשל [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשל וו
PFX V   0 לכשל" .
PFX V   0 לכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשלכ וו
PFX V   0 לכשלכ" .
PFX V   0 לכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשמ וו
PFX V   0 לכשמ" .
PFX V   0 לכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 לכשמכ וו
PFX V   0 לכשמכ" .
PFX V   0 לכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 מ [^ו]
PFX V   0 מ וו
PFX V   0 מ" .
PFX V   0 מו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 מב [^ו]
PFX V   0 מב וו
PFX V   0 מב" .
PFX V   0 מבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 מכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 מכ וו
PFX V   0 מכ" .
PFX V   0 מכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 מל [^ו]
PFX V   0 מל וו
PFX V   0 מל" .
PFX V   0 מלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 מש [^ו]
PFX V   0 מש וו
PFX V   0 מש" .
PFX V   0 משו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משב [^ו]
PFX V   0 משב וו
PFX V   0 משב" .
PFX V   0 משבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משבכ וו
PFX V   0 משבכ" .
PFX V   0 משבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משכ וו
PFX V   0 משכ" .
PFX V   0 משכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 משכב וו
PFX V   0 משכב" .
PFX V   0 משכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משככ וו
PFX V   0 משככ" .
PFX V   0 משככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 משכל וו
PFX V   0 משכל" .
PFX V   0 משכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משכמ וו
PFX V   0 משכמ" .
PFX V   0 משכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משל [^ו]
PFX V   0 משל וו
PFX V   0 משל" .
PFX V   0 משלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משלכ וו
PFX V   0 משלכ" .
PFX V   0 משלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משמ וו
PFX V   0 משמ" .
PFX V   0 משמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 משמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 משמכ וו
PFX V   0 משמכ" .
PFX V   0 משמכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 ש [^ו]
PFX V   0 ש וו
PFX V   0 ש" .
PFX V   0 שו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שב וו
PFX V   0 שב" .
PFX V   0 שבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שבכ וו
PFX V   0 שבכ" .
PFX V   0 שבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכ וו
PFX V   0 שכ" .
PFX V   0 שכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכב וו
PFX V   0 שכב" .
PFX V   0 שכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שככ וו
PFX V   0 שככ" .
PFX V   0 שככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכל וו
PFX V   0 שכל" .
PFX V   0 שכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכמ וו
PFX V   0 שכמ" .
PFX V   0 שכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכש [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכש וו
PFX V   0 שכש" .
PFX V   0 שכשו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשב וו
PFX V   0 שכשב" .
PFX V   0 שכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשבכ וו
PFX V   0 שכשבכ" .
PFX V   0 שכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכ וו
PFX V   0 שכשכ" .
PFX V   0 שכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכב וו
PFX V   0 שכשכב" .
PFX V   0 שכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשככ וו
PFX V   0 שכשככ" .
PFX V   0 שכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכל וו
PFX V   0 שכשכל" .
PFX V   0 שכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשכמ וו
PFX V   0 שכשכמ" .
PFX V   0 שכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשל וו
PFX V   0 שכשל" .
PFX V   0 שכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשלכ וו
PFX V   0 שכשלכ" .
PFX V   0 שכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשמ וו
PFX V   0 שכשמ" .
PFX V   0 שכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שכשמכ וו
PFX V   0 שכשמכ" .
PFX V   0 שכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 של [^ו]
PFX V   0 של וו
PFX V   0 של" .
PFX V   0 שלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכ וו
PFX V   0 שלכ" .
PFX V   0 שלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכש [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכש וו
PFX V   0 שלכש" .
PFX V   0 שלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשב וו
PFX V   0 שלכשב" .
PFX V   0 שלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשבכ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשבכ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשכ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכב וו
PFX V   0 שלכשכב" .
PFX V   0 שלכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשככ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשככ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכל וו
PFX V   0 שלכשכל" .
PFX V   0 שלכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשכמ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשכמ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשל וו
PFX V   0 שלכשל" .
PFX V   0 שלכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשלכ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשלכ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשמ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשמ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שלכשמכ וו
PFX V   0 שלכשמכ" .
PFX V   0 שלכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמ וו
PFX V   0 שמ" .
PFX V   0 שמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמכ וו
PFX V   0 שמכ" .
PFX V   0 שמכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמש [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמש וו
PFX V   0 שמש" .
PFX V   0 שמשו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשב וו
PFX V   0 שמשב" .
PFX V   0 שמשבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשבכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשבכ וו
PFX V   0 שמשבכ" .
PFX V   0 שמשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכ וו
PFX V   0 שמשכ" .
PFX V   0 שמשכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכב [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכב וו
PFX V   0 שמשכב" .
PFX V   0 שמשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשככ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשככ וו
PFX V   0 שמשככ" .
PFX V   0 שמשככו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכל וו
PFX V   0 שמשכל" .
PFX V   0 שמשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשכמ וו
PFX V   0 שמשכמ" .
PFX V   0 שמשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשל [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשל וו
PFX V   0 שמשל" .
PFX V   0 שמשלו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשלכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשלכ וו
PFX V   0 שמשלכ" .
PFX V   0 שמשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשמ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשמ וו
PFX V   0 שמשמ" .
PFX V   0 שמשמו ו[^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשמכ [^ו]
PFX V   0 שמשמכ וו
PFX V   0 שמשמכ" .
PFX V   0 שמשמכו ו[^ו]
