prince/dictionaries/he-IL.dic
אבקך/V
אבקנו/V
אגדם/V
אגמך/V
אגמן/V
אגפכם/V
אגפנו/V
אחותך/V
אחותנו/V
אפסם/V
ארזכן/V
ארסך/V
ארסנו/V
אתגרם/V
אתרכן/V
בגדכם/V
בדלה/V
בדלם/V
בוזכן/V
בורכם/V
בורנו/V
בלשם/V
בשרכן/V
גברך/V
גברן/V
גדמם/V
גורכן/V
גזרכן/V
גלגלכם/V
גלוונך/V
גלוונן/V
גלותך/V
גלותן/V
גללכן/V
גנותו/V
גנותכן/V
גנזכם/V
גננכן/V
געשך/V
געשן/V
גרבם/V
גרגרכן/V
גרותי/V
גרותם/V
גרמכם/V
גרפך/V
גרפן/V
גשרכן/V
גששה/V
גששם/V
דבקכם/V
דברה/V
דברם/V
דגלכן/V
דגמכן/V
דורכם/V
דורנו/V
דלקם/V
דמותי/V
דמותם/V
דרכך/V
דרכן/V
הדסכן/V
הדקה/V
הדקם/V
הדרכן/V
הזדהותו/V
הזדהותכן/V
הזדכותה/V
הזדכותכם/V
הזדכותנו/V
היבחרכן/V
היבעותה/V
היבעותכם/V
היבעותנו/V
הידמותך/V
הידמותן/V
היוולדכם/V
היוולדנו/V
היווסדכן/V
היותה/V
היותכם/V
היותנו/V
היחצותך/V
היחצותן/V
היטוותי/V
היטוותם/V
היירותו/V
היירותכן/V
היכוותה/V
היכוותכם/V
היכוותנו/V
היכרותך/V
היכרותן/V
הימנותה/V
הימנותכם/V
הימנותנו/V
הימצאכן/V
הימשותה/V
הימשותכם/V
הימשותנו/V
היספותך/V
היספותן/V
היעדרכם/V
היעדרנו/V
היעלמכן/V
היענותה/V
היענותכם/V
היענותנו/V
היעשותך/V
היעשותן/V
היפדותי/V
היפדותם/V
היקוותו/V
היקוותכן/V
היקרותה/V
היקרותכם/V
היקרותנו/V
היראותך/V
היראותן/V
הירצחכם/V
הירצחנו/V
הישלותך/V
הישלותן/V
הישנותי/V
הישנותם/V
היתלותו/V
היתלותכן/V
הלכך/V
הלכן/V
הלמם/V
הסתוותך/V
הסתוותן/V
הצטוותכן/V
השתאותך/V
השתאותן/V
השתהותי/V
השתהותם/V
השתוותי/V
השתוותם/V
השתחוותי/V
השתחוותם/V
השתטותו/V
השתטותכן/V
השתנותה/V
השתנותכם/V
השתנותנו/V
השתתותך/V
השתתותן/V
התאדותי/V
התאדותם/V
התאוותי/V
התאוותם/V
התאחותו/V
התאחותכן/V
התאמתך/V
התבדותו/V
התבדותכן/V
התבזותה/V
התבזותכם/V
התבזותנו/V
התבלותך/V
התבלותן/V
התגאותי/V
התגאותם/V
התגבותו/V
התגבותכן/V
התגלותה/V
התגלותכם/V
התגלותנו/V
התגרותך/V
התגרותן/V
התדמותי/V
התדמותם/V
התהוותי/V
התהוותם/V
התוודותו/V
התוודותכן/V
התחזותה/V
התחזותכם/V
התחזותנו/V
התחלותך/V
התחלותן/V
התחקותי/V
התחקותם/V
התחרותו/V
התחרותכן/V
התייפותה/V
התייפותכם/V
התייפותנו/V
התכהותך/V
התכהותן/V
התכלותי/V
התכלותם/V
התכנותו/V
התכנותכן/V
התכסותה/V
התכסותכם/V
התכסותנו/V
התלוותכם/V
התלוותנו/V
התמחותך/V
התמחותן/V
התמנותי/V
התמנותם/V
התמסותו/V
התמסותכן/V
התמצותה/V
התמצותכם/V
התמצותנו/V
התנאותך/V
התנאותן/V
התנסותי/V
התנסותם/V
התנקותו/V
התנקותכן/V
התעבותה/V
התעבותכם/V
התעבותנו/V
התעלותך/V
התעלותן/V
התענותי/V
התענותם/V
התערותו/V
התערותכן/V
התפנותה/V
התפנותכם/V
התפנותנו/V
התפתותך/V
התפתותן/V
התקשותי/V
התקשותם/V
התראותו/V
התראותכן/V
התרבותה/V
התרבותכם/V
התרבותנו/V
התרפותך/V
התרפותן/V
התרצותי/V
התרצותם/V
זבלך/V
זבלן/V
זגגכם/V
זגגנו/V
זובכם/V
זובנו/V
זוזכן/V
זחלך/V
זחלן/V
זכותך/V
זכותן/V
זלזלכן/V
זמזמכם/V
זממך/V
זממן/V
זנבכן/V
זנותה/V
זנותכן/V
זעמך/V
זעמן/V
זעפם/V
זקנם/V
זרותו/V
זרותכן/V
זרמך/V
זרמן/V
חבלם/V
חברם/V
חדרכן/V
חובכן/V
חוגך/V
חוגן/V
חודכם/V
חודנו/V
חולכן/V
חושכם/V
חושנו/V
חזותכם/V
חזותנו/V
חטאם/V
חטטכם/V
חטפך/V
חטפן/V
חייטם/V
חככן/V
חלבם/V
חלפם/V
חנותכם/V
חסותו/V
חסותכן/V
חסכך/V
חסמך/V
חסמן/V
חפותך/V
חפותן/V
חפצכן/V
חצבכם/V
חצותה/V
חצותכם/V
חצותנו/V
חצצם/V
חרבכן/V
חרקכם/V
חרשך/V
חרשן/V
חשדם/V
חשמלם/V
חשקכן/V
חששכם/V
חתכך/V
חתכן/V
חתמם/V
חתנכן/V
טבחך/V
טבחן/V
טווחם/V
טייחכן/V
טלפנכם/V
טלפננו/V
טעותך/V
טעותן/V
טפחכן/V
טרפכם/V
יזמך/V
יינני/V
ייננם/V
יצרכם/V
ירקי/V
ירקם/V
כאבם/V
כבלכן/V
כהותו/V
כהותכן/V
כזבה/V
כזבם/V
כייסכם/V
כלאך/V
כלאן/V
כללכן/V
כנותו/V
כנותכן/V
כסותי/V
כספכן/V
כעסך/V
כעסן/V
כפלכן/V
כפרכם/V
כרותי/V
כרכם/V
כרעכן/V
כשלכם/V
כשפה/V
כשפם/V
כתרך/V
כתרן/V
לבבכם/V
לבבנו/V
לבלבם/V
להטכן/V
לחמכם/V
לחשך/V
לחשן/V
לכתך/V
לכתן/V
לעגכן/V
לפתכן/V
לקותך/V
לקותן/V
מגנטכן/V
מדברכם/V
מדדך/V
מדדן/V
מותכם/V
מחשבכם/V
מלכך/V
מלכן/V
מלצרם/V
מסגרכן/V
מסדך/V
מסדן/V
מסמרך/V
מסמרן/V
מספרם/V
מענכן/V
מפותי/V
מצעכן/V
מקשך/V
מקשן/V
מרדכן/V
מרכזכן/V
מרפקכם/V
מרקה/V
מרקן/V
משלכן/V
משמשכן/V
מתחכן/V
נבטכן/V
נבלכם/V
נגנכם/V
נגעך/V
נגען/V
נדרן/V
נהגם/V
נהרכן/V
נחלך/V
נחשכם/V
נחשנו/V
נכותה/V
נכותכם/V
נכותנו/V
נכסם/V
נסככן/V
נפלם/V
נפשכן/V
נצנצכם/V
נקעך/V
נקען/V
נקרם/V
נשפם/V
נשרם/V
נתקכם/V
סבלך/V
סברך/V
סברן/V
סגלכן/V
סגרך/V
סגרן/V
סדקם/V
סיירכם/V
סמכם/V
סנדלכן/V
סעדכם/V
ספחך/V
ספחן/V
ספסרם/V
ספקכן/V
סקרכן/V
סרבלכן/V
סרחכם/V
סרטנך/V
סרטנן/V
סתרכן/V
סתתך/V
סתתן/V
עבותך/V
עבותן/V
עדרכן/V
עוללכם/V
עופה/V
עופם/V
עוררכם/V
עזרך/V
עזרן/V
עלותך/V
עלותן/V
עלעלכן/V
עמלכם/V
ענבכם/V
עניינך/V
עניינן/V
עסקכן/V
עפעפכן/V
עצבך/V
עצמן/V
ערככן/V
עשנך/V
פגמכן/V
פגרך/V
פחדכם/V
פלגה/V
פלחכם/V
פלטם/V
פלסנו/V
פסחכן/V
פעמכם/V
פערן/V
פקחכן/V
פרחך/V
פרנסם/V
פרפרכן/V
פרשננו/V
פשפשכן/V
צאתה/V
צאתנו/V
צבעכן/V
צדקכם/V
צומן/V
צורכן/V
צלבכם/V
צלמן/V
צלפכם/V
צלצלן/V
צמדכם/V
צמחם/V
צעדכם/V
צערם/V
צרצרך/V
קדחם/V
קהותו/V
קובה/V
קולך/V
קוצכן/V
קטען/V
קלותה/V
קלחכן/V
קלפך/V
קמחכן/V
קנסן/V
קעקעכן/V
קצפך/V
קרנם/V
קרקעך/V
קשקשם/V
רבבכם/V
רבעכן/V
רגלם/V
רגשך/V
רדתכן/V
רווחן/V
רחמכם/V
רחשן/V
ריבכן/V
רכבן/V
רמזכן/V
רסננו/V
רעדכן/V
רעמן/V
רצפם/V
רשפך/V
שבטכן/V
שברן/V
שגרן/V
שהותם/V
שוטך/V
שחקכן/V
שחרנו/V
שטותכם/V
שטחם/V
שייטך/V
שירכם/V
שישם/V
שכנך/V
שלבכם/V
שלטם/V
שמשכם/V
שערן/V
שצפך/V
שקדם/V
שקעכן/V
שקפן/V
שרותה/V
שרותנו/V
שתכם/V
תדרכן/V
תורך/V
תכנתך/V
תלותם/V
תמכם/V
